Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2130.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:(1) 2025 c 422 s 1 (uncodified);(2) 2025 c 422 s 101;(3) 2025 c 422 s 201;(4) 2025 c 422 s 301;(5) 2025 c 422 s 401 (uncodified);(6) 2025 c 422 s 402 (uncodified);(7) 2025 c 422 s 403 (uncodified); and(8) 2025 c 422 s 404 (uncodified).NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. RCW 82.32.805 and 82.32.808 do not apply to this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect April 1, 2026.--- END ---